Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Commissions

45-3-30.
Officers commissioned under great seal of state.

The commissions of the following officers shall have annexed thereto the great seal of the state, and shall be signed by the Governor and countersigned by the Secretary of State, namely: senators and representatives in Congress; Justices of the Supreme Court; Judges of the Court of Appeals, superior courts, and juvenile courts; the Attorney General; district attorneys; reporters of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals; the Secretary of State; the Commissioner of Insurance; and all military officers of the grade of general. The commissions of all federal and judicial officers enumerated above shall be on parchment.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 129; Code 1868, § 124; Code 1873, § 133; Code 1882, § 133; Civil Code 1895, § 227; Civil Code 1910, § 262; Code 1933, § 89-201; Ga. L. 1984, p. 565, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-3-31.
Officers commissioned under executive seal.

The commissions of all other civil officers, except constables and clerks of magistrate courts, of the state or county shall be under the seal of the office of the Governor, signed by the Governor, and countersigned by one of his secretaries. All officers of the militia of the grade of lieutenant or higher shall have commissions under the seal of the office of the Governor.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 130; Code 1868, § 125; Code 1873, § 134; Code 1882, § 134; Civil Code 1895, § 228; Civil Code 1910, § 263; Code 1933, § 89-202; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 3-32; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1987, p. 398, § 2.